Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 5. PROTECTION OF CONSUMER INTERESTS

SUBTITLE B. CONSUMER SERVICE PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 522. CONSUMER INFORMATION IN SPANISH

Sec. 522.001. INFORMATIONAL SHEET FOR TEXAS PERSONAL AUTOMOBILE POLICIES. (a) The commissioner shall develop or adopt an informational sheet in the Spanish language to provide a general explanation of the terms most commonly used in the Texas personal automobile insurance policy. The department shall make the informational sheet available to the public.

(b) The informational sheet is intended to provide only a general explanation of insurance terms used in the Texas personal automobile insurance policy and is not intended to alter any rights, obligations, or responsibilities of the contracting parties. All other applicable laws, including provisions of this code, apply regardless of whether an informational sheet is used.

(c) The informational sheet must include a disclaimer in the Spanish language, prominently printed in 10-point boldfaced type at the top of the informational sheet, that contains the following:

"This document is for informational purposes only and is not intended to alter or replace the insurance policy. Additionally, this informational sheet is not intended to fully set out your rights and obligations or the rights and obligations of the insurer. If you have questions about your insurance, you should consult your insurance agent, the insurer, or the language of the insurance policy."

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2005.